Hawaii statutes.
§104-29 Rules. Subject to chapter 91,
the director shall adopt reasonable rules for determining the prevailing wages,
enforcement, administration, and general purposes of this chapter. These rules
shall have the force and effect of law. [L 1995, c 181, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next